Virginia statutes. Title 33.2. Highways and Other Surface Transportation Systems.
Article 3. Incorporation of District; Creation, Organization, Etc., of Commission.

§ 33.2-1905.
District a body corporate.

Each transportation district created pursuant to this chapter, or pursuant to an act of the General Assembly, is hereby created as a body corporate and politic under the name of, and to be known by, the name of the district with the word “commission” appended.

History.

1964, c. 631, § 15.1-1346; 1997, c. 587, § 15.1-4505; 2014, c. 805.

§ 33.2-1906.
Creation of commission to control corporation.

In and for each transportation district a commission is hereby created to manage and control the functions, affairs, and property of the corporation and to exercise all of the rights, powers, and authority and perform all of the duties conferred or imposed upon the corporation.

History.

1964, c. 631, § 15.1-1347; 1997, c. 587, § 15.1-4506; 2014, c. 805.

§ 33.2-1907.
Members of transportation commissions.

Any transportation district commission created pursuant to this chapter shall consist of the number of members the component governments shall agree upon, or as may otherwise be provided by law. The governing body of each participating county and city shall appoint from among its members the number of commissioners to which the county or city is entitled; however, for those commissions with powers as set forth in subsection A of §

33.2-1915

, the governing body of each participating county or city is not limited to appointing commissioners from among its members. In addition, the governing body may appoint, from its number or otherwise, designated alternate members for those appointed to the commission who shall be able to exercise all of the powers and duties of a commission member when the regular member is absent from commission meetings. Each such appointee shall serve at the pleasure of the appointing body; however, no appointee to a commission with powers as set forth in subsection B of §

33.2-1915

may continue to serve when he is no longer a member of the appointing body. Each governing body shall inform the commission of its appointments to and removals from the commission by delivering to the commission a certified copy of the resolution making the appointment or causing the removal.The Chairman of the Commonwealth Transportation Board, or his designee, shall be a member of each commission, ex officio with voting privileges. The Chairman of the Commonwealth Transportation Board may appoint an alternate member who may exercise all the powers and duties of the Chairman of the Commonwealth Transportation Board when neither the Chairman of the Commonwealth Transportation Board nor his designee is present at a commission meeting.The Potomac and Rappahannock Transportation Commission shall also include two members who reside within the boundaries of the transportation district appointed by the Speaker of the House who may be members of the House of Delegates and one member of the Senate appointed by the Senate Committee on Rules. Each legislative member shall be from a legislative district located wholly or in part within the boundaries of the transportation district and shall serve a term coincident with his term of office. The members of the General Assembly shall be eligible for reappointment for successive terms. Vacancies occurring other than by expiration of a term shall be filled for the unexpired term. Vacancies shall be filled in the same manner as the original appointments.The Transportation District Commission of Hampton Roads shall include one member of the House of Delegates and one member of the Senate, one of whom shall represent a district that includes the City of Hampton or Newport News and one of whom shall represent a district that includes the City of Chesapeake, Norfolk, Portsmouth, or Virginia Beach. The member of the House of Delegates shall be appointed by the Speaker of the House of Delegates for a term coincident with his term of office, and the member of the Senate shall be appointed by the Senate Committee on Rules for a term coincident with his term of office. The members of the General Assembly shall be eligible for reappointment for successive terms, and vacancies occurring other than by expiration of a term shall be filled for the unexpired term. The Transportation District Commission of Hampton Roads shall also consist of one nonlegislative citizen member appointed by the Governor from each county and city embraced by the transportation district. Nonlegislative citizen members shall have experience in at least one of the following fields: transit, transportation, or land use planning; management of transit, transportation, or other public sector operations; public budgeting or finance; corporate communications; government oversight; or state or local government. All gubernatorial appointments shall be for terms of four years. The governing body of each such county or city may appoint either a member of its governing body or its county or city manager to serve as an ex officio member with voting privileges. Every such ex officio member shall be allowed to attend all meetings of the commission that other members may be required to attend. Vacancies shall be filled in the same manner as the original appointments.

The Secretary or his designee and any appointed member of the Northern Virginia Transportation Commission are authorized to serve as members of the board of directors of the Washington Metropolitan Area Transit Authority (§

33.2-3100

et seq.) and while so serving the provisions of §

2.2-2800

shall not apply to such member. In appointing Virginia members of the board of directors of the Washington Metropolitan Area Transit Authority (WMATA), the Northern Virginia Transportation Commission shall include the Secretary or his designee as a principal member on the board of directors of WMATA. Any designee serving as the principal member must reside in a locality served by WMATA.In selecting from its membership those members to serve on the board of directors of WMATA, the Northern Virginia Transportation Commission shall comply with the following requirements:

A board member shall not have been an employee of WMATA within one year of appointment to serve on the board of directors.

A board member shall have (i) experience in at least one of the fields of transit planning, transportation planning, or land use planning; transit or transportation management or other public sector management; engineering; finance; public safety; homeland security; human resources; or the law or (ii) knowledge of the region’s transportation issues derived from working on regional transportation issue resolution.

A board member shall be a regular patron of the services provided by WMATA.

Board members shall serve a term of four years with a maximum of two consecutive terms. A board member’s term or terms must coincide with his term on the body that appointed him to the Northern Virginia Transportation Commission. Any vacancy created if a board member cannot fulfill his term because his term on the appointing body has ended shall be filled for the unexpired term in the same manner as the member being replaced was appointed within 60 days of the vacancy. The initial appointments to a four-year term will be as follows: the Secretary, or his designee, for a term of four years; the second principal member for a term of three years; one alternate for a term of two years; and the remaining alternate for a term of one year. Thereafter, board members shall be appointed for terms of four years. Service on the WMATA board of directors prior to July 1, 2012, shall not be considered in determining length of service. Any person appointed to an initial one-year or two-year term, or appointed to an unexpired term in which two years or less is remaining, shall be eligible to serve two consecutive four-year terms after serving the initial or unexpired term.

Members may be removed from the board of directors of WMATA if they attend fewer than three-fourths of the meetings in a calendar year; if they are conflicted due to employment at WMATA; or if they are found to be in violation of the State and Local Government Conflict of Interests Act (§

2.2-3100

et seq.). If a board member is removed during a term, the vacancy shall be filled pursuant to the provisions of subdivision 4.

Each member of the Northern Virginia Transportation Commission appointed to the board of directors of WMATA shall file semiannual reports with the Secretary’s office beginning July 1, 2012. The reports shall include (i) the dates of attendance at WMATA board meetings, (ii) any reasons for not attending a specific meeting, and (iii) dates and attendance at other WMATA-related public events.

Each nonelected member of the Northern Virginia Transportation Commission appointed to the board of directors of WMATA shall be eligible to receive reasonable and necessary expenses and compensation pursuant to §§

2.2-2813

and

2.2-2825

from the Northern Virginia Transportation Commission for attending meetings and for the performance of his official duties as a board member on that day.Any entity that provides compensation to a WMATA board member for his service on the WMATA board shall be required to submit on July 1 of each year to the Secretary the amount of that compensation. Such letter will remain on file with the Secretary’s office and be available for public review.

When the Northern Virginia Transportation Commission and the Potomac and Rappahannock Transportation Commission enter into an agreement to operate a commuter railway, the agreement governing the creation of the railway shall provide that the Chairman of the Commonwealth Transportation Board or his designee shall have one vote on the oversight board for the railway. For each year in which the state contribution to the railway is greater than or equal to the highest contribution from an individual locality, the total annual subsidy as provided by the member localities used to determine vote weights shall be recalculated to include the Commonwealth contributing an amount equal to the highest contributing locality. The vote weights shall be recalculated to provide the Chairman of the Commonwealth Transportation Board or his designee the same weight as the highest contributing locality. The revised vote weights shall be used in determining the passage of motions before the oversight board.

History.

1964, c. 631, § 15.1-1348; 1966, c. 419; 1973, c. 231; 1975, c. 179; 1977, c. 137; 1986, c. 438; 1987, c. 441; 1993, c. 867; 1997, c. 587, § 15.1-4507; 2000, cc. 439, 443; 2004, c. 1000; 2011, c. 515; 2012, c. 377; 2013, c. 589; 2014, cc. 655, 721, 805; 2016, c. 130; 2018, Sp. Sess. I, c. 2; 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 435.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2013, c. 589, cl. 2, as amended by Acts 2014, c. 428, cl. 1 provides: “That the provisions of this act shall become effective on July 1, 2015.”

Acts 2014, cc. 655 and 721, amended former § 15.2-4507, from which this section is derived.
Pursuant to § 30-152, the 2014 amendments by cc. 655 and 721 have been given effect in this section, by adding the second and third sentences in the fourth paragraph in subsection A.

Acts 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 435, cl. 2 provides:

“That the provisions of this act amending the qualifications of nonlegislative citizen members appointed to serve on the Transportation District Commission of Hampton Roads (the Commission) shall not affect the appointment of any nonlegislative citizen member of the Commission as of the effective date of this act [July 1, 2021] until the expiration of the term of such nonlegislative citizen member.”

The 2016 amendments.

The 2016 amendment by c. 130, in subsection B, added “The Secretary or his designee and” and substituted “are authorized to serve as members” for “and the Secretary or his designee is authorized to serve as a member”; and added the first paragraph of subdivision B 7.

The 2018 amendments.

The 2018 amendment by Sp. Sess. I, c. 2, effective July 1, 2018, in the third paragraph in subsection A, rewrote the first two sentences as the first sentence, which formerly read “The Potomac and Rappahannock Transportation Commission shall also include two members of the House of Delegates and one member of the Senate from legislative districts located wholly or in part within the boundaries of the transportation district. The members of the House of Delegates shall be appointed by the Speaker of the House for terms coincident with their terms of office, and the member of the Senate shall be appointed by the Senate Committee on Rules for a term coincident with his term of office” and substituted “Each legislative member shall be from a legislative district located wholly or in part within the boundaries of the transportation district and shall serve” for “for” in the second sentence.

The 2021 Sp. Sess. I amendments.

The 2021 amendment by Sp. Sess. I, c. 435, effective July 1, 2021, rewrote the first three sentences in the last paragraph in subsection A, which formerly read: “The Transportation District Commission of Hampton Roads shall consist of one nonlegislative citizen member appointed by the Governor from each county and city embraced by the transportation district. However, for the gubernatorial appointments that will become effective July 1, 2016, three of the appointments shall be for initial terms of two years and three appointments shall be for terms of four years. Thereafter, all gubernatorial appointments shall be for terms of four years so as to stagger the terms of the gubernatorial appointees.”

§ 33.2-1908.
Officers of commission.

Within 30 days after the appointment of the original commission members, the commission shall meet on the call of any member and shall elect one of its members as chairman and another as vice-chairman, each to serve for a term of one year or until his successor is elected and qualified. The commission shall employ a secretary and treasurer, who may or may not be a member of the commission, and, if not a commission member, fix his compensation and duties. All officers shall be eligible for reelection. Each commission member, before entering on the performance of his public duties, shall take and subscribe the oath or affirmation specified in Article II, Section 7 of the Constitution of Virginia. Such oath may be administered by any person authorized to administer oaths under §

49-4

.

History.

1964, c. 631, § 15.1-1349; 1971, Ex. Sess., c. 1; 1987, c. 153; 1997, c. 587, § 15.1-4508; 2014, c. 805.

§ 33.2-1909.
Bonds of members.

Each commission member shall, before entering upon the discharge of his duties under this chapter, give bond payable to the Commonwealth in a form approved by the Attorney General, in such penalty as fixed by the Governor, with some surety or guaranty company authorized to do business in the Commonwealth and approved by the Governor, as security, conditioned upon the faithful discharge of his duties. The premium of such bonds shall be paid by the commission and the bonds shall be filed with and preserved by the Department of the Treasury’s Division of Risk Management.

History.

1964, c. 631, § 15.1-1350; 1997, c. 587, § 15.1-4509; 2002, c. 32; 2014, c. 805.

§ 33.2-1910.
Compensation and expenses of members.

The commission members shall receive no salary but shall be entitled to reimbursement of all reasonable and necessary expenses and compensation allowed members of the Commonwealth Transportation Board for the performance of their official duties as provided in §§

2.2-2813

and

2.2-2825

.

History.

1964, c. 631, § 15.1-1351; 1997, c. 587, § 15.1-4510; 2004, c. 1000; 2014, c. 805.

§ 33.2-1911.
Meetings of commission.

Regular meetings of the commission shall be held at least once every month at such time and place as the commission shall prescribe. Special meetings of the commission shall be held upon mailed notice, or actual notice otherwise given, to each commission member upon call of the chairman or any two commission members, at such time and in such place within the district as such notice may specify, or at such other time and place with or without notice as all commission members may expressly approve. All regular and special meetings of the commission shall be open to the public, but the public shall not be entitled to any notice other than provided in this section. Unless a meeting is called for the purpose of a public hearing, members of the public shall have no right to be heard or otherwise participate in the proceedings of the meeting, except to the extent the chairman may in specific instances grant. All commission records shall be public records.

History.

1964, c. 631, § 15.1-1352; 1997, c. 587, § 15.1-4511; 2014, c. 805.

§ 33.2-1912.
Quorum and action by commission.

A majority of the commission, which majority shall include at least one commissioner from a majority of the component governments, shall constitute a quorum. Members of the commission who are members of the General Assembly shall not be counted in determining a quorum while the General Assembly is in session. The Chairman of the Commonwealth Transportation Board or his designee shall be included for the purposes of constituting a quorum. The presence of a quorum and a vote of the majority of the members necessary to constitute a quorum of all the members appointed to the commission, including an affirmative vote from a majority of the members, shall be necessary to take any action. The Chairman of the Commonwealth Transportation Board or his designee shall have voting rights equal to appointees of component governments on all matters brought before the commission. Notwithstanding the provisions of §

2.2-3708.2

, members of the General Assembly may participate in the meetings of the commission through electronic communication means while the General Assembly is in session.

History.

1964, c. 631, § 15.1-1353; 1966, c. 419; 1975, c. 7; 1997, c. 587, § 15.1-4512; 2004, c. 1000; 2013, c. 589; 2014, c. 805; 2018, c. 55.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2013, c. 589, cl. 2, as amended by Acts 2014, c. 428, cl. 1 provides: “That the provisions of this act shall become effective on July 1, 2015.”

The 2013 amendments.

The 2013 amendment by c. 589, effective July 1, 2015, substituted “shall be included” for “may be included” in the third sentence; substituted “members” for “jurisdictions represented” in the fourth sentence, and inserted the fifth sentence.

The 2018 amendments.

The 2018 amendment by c. 55 substituted “§

2.2-3708

.2” for “§

2.2-3708

” and “electronic communication means” for “electronic communications” in the last sentence.

§ 33.2-1913.
Funds of commission.

All moneys of a commission, whether derived from any contract of the commission or from any other source, shall be collected, received, held, secured, and disbursed in accordance with any relevant contract of the commission. This section shall apply to such moneys only if and to the extent they are consistent with such commission contracts.

Such moneys shall not be required to be paid into the state treasury or into the treasury or to any officer of any county or city.

All such moneys shall be deposited by the commission in a separate bank account, appropriately designated, in banks or trust companies designated by the commission.

History.

1964, c. 631, § 15.1-1355; 1997, c. 587, § 15.1-4513; 2014, c. 805.

§ 33.2-1914.
Accounts and records.

Every commission shall keep and preserve complete and accurate accounts and records of all moneys received and disbursed; business and operations; and all property and funds it owns, manages, or controls. Each commission shall prepare and transmit to the Governor and to the governing body of each county and city within the district, annually and at such other times as the Governor requires, complete and accurate reports of the state and content of such accounts and records, together with other relevant information as the Governor may require.

History.

1964, c. 631, § 15.1-1356; 1997, c. 587, § 15.1-4514; 2014, c. 805.